Florida, session 2026, SB156.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âOfficer Jason 25 Raynor Act.â 26 Section 2.âSection 776.051, Florida Statutes, is amended to 27 read: 28 776.051âUse or threatened use of force in resisting arrest 29 or detention making an arrest or in the execution of a legal 30 duty; prohibition.â 31 (1)âA person is not justified in the use or threatened use 32 of force to resist any an arrest or detention by a law 33 enforcement officer, or to resist a law enforcement officer who 34 is engaged in the performance of his or her official duties as 35 described in s. 943.10(1) execution of a legal duty, if the law 36 enforcement officer was acting in good faith and he or she is 37 known, or reasonably appears, to be a law enforcement officer. 38 As used in this section, the term âacting in good faithâ means 39 to make sincere and reasonable efforts to comply with legal 40 requirements, even if the arrest, detention, or other act is 41 later found to have been unlawful 42 (2)âA law enforcement officer, or any person whom the 43 officer has summoned or directed to assist him or her, is not 44 justified in the use of force if the arrest or execution of a 45 legal duty is unlawful and known by him or her to be unlawful. 46 Section 3.âSection 782.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to 47 read: 48 782.065âMurder; law enforcement officer, correctional 49 officer, correctional probation officer.âNotwithstanding ss. 50 775.082, 775.0823, 782.04, 782.051, and chapter 921, a defendant 51 must shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without eligibility 52 for release upon findings by the trier of fact that, beyond a 53 reasonable doubt: 54 (1)âThe defendant committed murder in the first degree in 55 violation of s. 782.04(1) and a death sentence was not imposed; 56 murder in the second or third degree in violation of s. 57 782.04(2), (3), or (4); attempted murder in the first or second 58 degree in violation of s. 782.04(1)(a)1. or (2); or attempted 59 felony murder in violation of s. 782.051; or manslaughter in 60 violation of s. 782.07(1); and 61 (2)âThe victim of any offense described in subsection (1) 62 was a law enforcement officer, part-time law enforcement 63 officer, auxiliary law enforcement officer, correctional 64 officer, part-time correctional officer, auxiliary correctional 65 officer, correctional probation officer, part-time correctional 66 probation officer, or auxiliary correctional probation officer, 67 as those terms are defined in s. 943.10, who was engaged in the 68 performance of his or her official duties as described in s. 69 943.10 lawful performance of a legal duty. 70 Section 4.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) and subsection 71 (2) of section 784.07, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 72 784.07âAssault or battery of law enforcement officers and 73 other specified personnel; reclassification of offenses; minimum 74 sentences.â 75 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 76 (e)ââLaw enforcement officerâ includes a law enforcement 77 officer, a correctional officer, a correctional probation 78 officer, a part-time law enforcement officer, a part-time 79 correctional officer, an auxiliary law enforcement officer, and 80 an auxiliary correctional officer, as those terms are 81 respectively defined in s. 943.10, and any county probation 82 officer; an employee or agent of the Department of Corrections 83 who supervises or provides services to inmates; an officer of 84 the Florida Commission on Offender Review; a federal law 85 enforcement officer as defined in s. 901.1505; and law 86 enforcement personnel of the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 87 Commission, the Department of Environmental Protection, or the 88 Department of Law Enforcement. The duties and responsibilities 89 of these respective positions are described in s. 943.10. 90 (2)âWhenever any person is charged with knowingly 91 committing an assault or battery upon a law enforcement officer, 92 a firefighter, an emergency medical care provider, hospital 93 personnel, a railroad special officer, a traffic accident 94 investigation officer as described in s. 316.640, a nonsworn law 95 enforcement agency employee who is certified as an agency 96 inspector, a blood alcohol analyst, or a breath test operator 97 while such employee is in uniform and engaged in processing, 98 testing, evaluating, analyzing, or transporting a person who is 99 detained or under arrest for DUI, a law enforcement explorer, a 100 traffic infraction enforcement officer as described in s. 101 316.640, a parking enforcement specialist as defined in s. 102 316.640, a person licensed as a security officer as defined in 103 s. 493.6101 and wearing a uniform that bears at least one patch 104 or emblem that is visible at all times that clearly identifies 105 the employing agency and that clearly identifies the person as a 106 licensed security officer, a security officer employed by the 107 board of trustees of a community college, or a utility worker 108 engaged in work on critical infrastructure as defined in s. 109 812.141(1), while the officer, firefighter, emergency medical 110 care provider, hospital personnel, railroad special officer, 111 traffic accident investigation officer, traffic infraction 112 enforcement officer, inspector, analyst, operator, law 113 enforcement explorer, parking enforcement specialist, public 114 transit employee or agent, security officer, or utility worker 115 is engaged in the lawful performance of his or her official 116 duties, the offense for which the person is charged shall be 117 reclassified as follows: 118 (a)âIn the case of assault, from a misdemeanor of the 119 second degree to a misdemeanor of the first degree. 120 (b)âIn the case of battery, from a misdemeanor of the first 121 degree to a felony of the third degree. Notwithstanding any 122 other provision of law, a person convicted of battery upon a law 123 enforcement officer committed in furtherance of a riot or an 124 aggravated riot prohibited under s. 870.01 shall be sentenced to 125 a minimum term of imprisonment of 6 months. 126 (c)âIn the case of aggravated assault, from a felony of the 127 third degree to a felony of the second degree. Notwithstanding 128 any other provision of law, any person convicted of aggravated 129 assault upon a law enforcement officer shall be sentenced to a 130 minimum term of imprisonment of 3 years. 131 (d)âIn the case of aggravated battery, from a felony of the 132 second degree to a felony of the first degree. Notwithstanding 133 any other provision of law, any person convicted of aggravated 134 battery of a law enforcement officer shall be sentenced to a 135 minimum term of imprisonment of 5 years. 136 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 843.01, Florida 137 Statutes, is amended to read: 138 843.01âResisting, obstructing, or opposing by offering or 139 doing violence to legally authorized person, police canine, or 140 police horse.â 141 (1)âWhoever knowingly and willfully resists, obstructs, or 142 opposes any officer as defined in s. 943.10(1), (2), (3), (6), 143 (7), (8), or (9); member of the Florida Commission on Offender 144 Review or any administrative aide or supervisor employed by the 145 commission; parole and probation supervisor; county probation 146 officer; personnel or representative of the Department of Law 147 Enforcement; or other person legally authorized to execute 148 process in the execution of legal process or engaged in the 149 performance of his or her official duties as described in s. 150 943.10 lawful execution of any legal duty, by offering or doing 151 violence to the person of such officer or legally authorized 152 person, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 153 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 154 Section 6.âParagraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (3) of 155 section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 156 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 157 chart.â 158 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 159 (d)âLEVEL 4 160 161 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 162 104.155 3rd Unqualified noncitizen electors voting; aiding or soliciting noncitizen electors in voting. 163 499.0051(1) 3rd Failure to maintain or deliver transaction history, transaction information, or transaction statements. 164 499.0051(5) 2nd Knowing sale or delivery, or possession with intent to sell, contraband prescription drugs. 165 517.07(1) 3rd Failure to register securities. 166 517.12(1) 3rd Failure of dealer or associated person of a dealer of securities to register. 167 784.031 3rd Battery by strangulation. 168 784.07(2)(b) 3rd Battery of law enforcement officer, firefighter, etc. 169 784.074(1)(c) 3rd Battery of sexually violent predators facility staff. 170 784.075 3rd Battery on detention or commitment facility staff. 171 784.078 3rd Battery of facility employee by throwing, tossing, or expelling certain fluids or materials. 172 784.08(2)(c) 3rd Battery on a person 65 years of age or older. 173 784.081(3) 3rd Battery on specified official or employee. 174 784.082(3) 3rd Battery by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 175 784.083(3) 3rd Battery on code inspector. 176 784.085 3rd Battery of child by throwing, tossing, projecting, or expelling certain fluids or materials. 177 787.03(1) 3rd Interference with custody; wrongly takes minor from appointed guardian. 178 787.04(2) 3rd Take, entice, or remove child beyond state limits with criminal intent pending custody proceedings. 179 787.04(3) 3rd Carrying child beyond state lines with criminal intent to avoid producing child at custody hearing or delivering to designated person. 180 787.07 3rd Human smuggling. 181 790.115(1) 3rd Exhibiting firearm or weapon within 1,000 feet of a school. 182 790.115(2)(b) 3rd Possessing electric weapon or device, destructive device, or other weapon on school property. 183 790.115(2)(c) 3rd Possessing firearm on school property. 184 794.051(1) 3rd Indecent, lewd, or lascivious touching of certain minors. 185 800.04(7)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition; offender less than 18 years. 186 806.135 2nd Destroying or demolishing a memorial or historic property. 187 810.02(4)(a) 3rd Burglary, or attempted burglary, of an unoccupied structure; unarmed; no assault or battery. 188 810.02(4)(b) 3rd Burglary, or attempted burglary, of an unoccupied conveyance; unarmed; no assault or battery. 189 810.06 3rd Burglary; possession of tools. 190 810.08(2)(c) 3rd Trespass on property, armed with firearm or dangerous weapon. 191 810.145(3)(b) 3rd Digital voyeurism dissemination. 192 812.014(2)(c)3. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree $10,000 or more but less than $20,000. 193 812.014â(2)(c)4. &â6.-10. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; specified items. 194 812.014(2)(d)2. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; $750 or more taken from dwelling or its unenclosed curtilage. 195 812.014(2)(e)3. 3rd Petit theft, 1st degree; less than $40 taken from dwelling or its unenclosed curtilage with two or more prior theft convictions. 196 812.0195(2) 3rd Dealing in stolen property by use of the Internet; property stolen $300 or more. 197 817.505(4)(a) 3rd Patient brokering. 198 817.563(1) 3rd Sell or deliver substance other than controlled substance agreed upon, excluding s. 893.03(5) drugs. 199 817.568(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of personal identification information. 200 817.5695(3)(c) 3rd Exploitation of person 65 years of age or older, value less than $10,000. 201 817.625(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of scanning device, skimming device, or reencoder. 202 817.625(2)(c) 3rd Possess, sell, or deliver skimming device. 203 828.125(1) 2nd Kill, maim, or cause great bodily harm or permanent breeding disability to any registered horse or cattle. 204 836.14(2) 3rd Person who commits theft of a sexually explicit image with intent to promote it. 205 836.14(3) 3rd Person who willfully possesses a sexually explicit image with certain knowledge, intent, and purpose. 206 837.02(1) 3rd Perjury in official proceedings. 207 837.021(1) 3rd Make contradictory statements in official proceedings. 208 838.022 3rd Official misconduct. 209 839.13(2)(a) 3rd Falsifying records of an individual in the care and custody of a state agency. 210 839.13(2)(c) 3rd Falsifying records of the Department of Children and Families. 211 843.021 3rd Possession of a concealed handcuff key by a person in custody. 212 843.025 3rd Deprive law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officer of means of protection or communication. 213 843.15(1)(a) 3rd Failure to appear while on bail for felony (bond estreature or bond jumping). 214 843.19(2) 2nd Injure, disable, or kill police, fire, or SAR canine or police horse. 215 847.0135(5)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition using computer; offender less than 18 years. 216 870.01(3) 2nd Aggravated rioting. 217 870.01(5) 2nd Aggravated inciting a riot. 218 874.05(1)(a) 3rd Encouraging or recruiting another to join a criminal gang. 219 893.13(2)(a)1. 2nd Purchase of cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (b), or (d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs). 220 914.14(2) 3rd Witnesses accepting bribes. 221 914.22(1) 3rd Force, threaten, etc., witness, victim, or informant. 222 914.23(2) 3rd Retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant, no bodily injury. 223 916.1085â(2)(c)1. 3rd Introduction of specified contraband into certain DCF facilities. 224 934.215 3rd Use of two-way communications device to facilitate commission of a crime. 225 944.47(1)(a)6. 3rd Introduction of contraband (cellular telephone or other portable communication device) into correctional institution. 226 951.22(1)(h),â(j) & (k) 3rd Intoxicating drug, instrumentality or other device to aid escape, or cellular telephone or other portable communication device introduced into county detention facility. 227 (e)âLEVEL 5 228 229 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 230 316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury, failure to stop; leaving scene. 231 316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 232 316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel; obtaining fuel fraudulently. 233 322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor vehicle with suspended license, resulting in death or serious bodily injury. 234 327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 235 365.172â(14)(b)2. 2nd Misuse of emergency communications system resulting in death. 236 379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to: willful molestation of stone crab traps, lines, or buoys; illegal bartering, trading, or sale, conspiring or aiding in such barter, trade, or sale, or supplying, agreeing to supply, aiding in supplying, or giving away stone crab trap tags or certificates; making, altering, forging, counterfeiting, or reproducing stone crab trap tags; possession of forged, counterfeit, or imitation stone crab trap tags; and engaging in the commercial harvest of stone crabs while license is suspended or revoked. 237 379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a commercial harvesterâs spiny lobster trap, line, or buoy. 238 379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more undersized spiny lobsters. 239 381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs knowing HIV positive. 240 440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workersâ compensation coverage. 241 440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the purpose of making workersâ compensation claims. 242 440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false, misleading, or incomplete information with the purpose of avoiding or reducing workersâ compensation premiums. 243 624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a certificate or authority; premium collected $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 244 626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized insurer; repeat offender. 245 784.07(2)(b) 3rd Battery of law enforcement officer, firefighter, etc. 246 790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a concealed firearm. 247 790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge destructive device. 248 790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, or use of firearms in violent manner. 249 790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled shotgun or machine gun. 250 790.23 2nd Felons in possession of firearms, ammunition, or electronic weapons or devices. 251 796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a prostitute; 1st offense. 252 800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender less than 18 years of age. 253 800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition; offender 18 years of age or older. 254 806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or dispense fire bomb with intent to damage any structure or property. 255 810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism dissemination. 256 810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or subsequent offense. 257 810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims. 258 812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft from 20 or more dwellings or their unenclosed curtilage, or any combination. 259 812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $10,000 or more but less than $50,000. 260 812.015â(8)(a) & (c)-(e) 3rd Retail theft; property stolen is valued at $750 or more and one or more specified acts. 261 812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 262 812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons. 263 812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or trafficking in. 264 812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets. 265 812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching. 266 812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop. 267 817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value $20,000 to $50,000. 268 817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 269 817.2341(1),â(2)(a) & (3)(a) 3rd Filing false financial statements, making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity. 270 817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal identification information; value of benefit, services received, payment avoided, or amount of injury or fraud, $5,000 or more or use of personal identification information of 10 or more persons. 271 817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 272 817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent use of scanning device, skimming device, or reencoder. 273 825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition in the presence of an elderly person or disabled adult. 274 828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent to inflict intense pain, serious physical injury, or death. 275 836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes for financial gain a sexually explicit image of an identifiable person without consent. 276 839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an individual in the care and custody of a state agency involving great bodily harm or death. 277 843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to person; resist arrest with violence. 278 847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition using computer; offender 18 years or older. 279 847.0137â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of pornography by electronic device or equipment. 280 847.0138â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of material harmful to minors to a minor by electronic device or equipment. 281 874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting another to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 282 874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 years of age to join a criminal gang. 283 893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs). 284 893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis (or other s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 285 893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of university. 286 893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 287 893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of public housing facility. 288 893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 289 893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 290 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.